Montana, session 2025, HB832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Provider training grant program for posttraumatic stress disorder therapies --
reporting. (1) There is a posttraumatic stress disorder provider training grant program administered by the
department of labor and industry. The purpose of the grant program is to fund training opportunities for health
care providers in nonmedication therapy to treat posttraumatic stress disorder.
(2) The department shall award a grant to an entity to develop and operate a 2-year project. The
grantee:
(a) must be selected through a competitive process established by the department;
(b) shall undertake community and stakeholder engagement for the planning process prior to the
implementation of training;
(c) provide training to mental health professionals as defined in 37-39-102 in nonmedication
therapy to treat posttraumatic stress disorder; and
(d) provide reporting on project outcomes as required by the department on a quarterly basis,
which must include:
(i) the number of mental health professionals trained; and
(ii) the cost for each mental health professional trained.
(3) The department shall provide a report to the economic affairs interim committee by July 1 of
each year until project completion.
Section 2. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $600,000 from the state general fund to the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 832
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 832
department of labor and industry for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes described in [section
1].
(2) The legislature intends that this is a one-time-only appropriation.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 832
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 832, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 832
INTRODUCED BY J. SCHILLINGER
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A PROVIDER TRAINING GRANT PROGRAM FOR POSTTRAUMATIC STRESS
DISORDER THERAPIES; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”